tortoisesvn/ext/spell/ar.aff
FLAG	long
#أنتِ-أنتما-أنتم
SFX	2B	Y	36
SFX	2B	أ	ئينه/BcBgBkd0e0f0g0X0	أ
SFX	2B	ا	ينه/BcBgBkd0e0f0g0X0	ا
SFX	2B	و	ينه/BcBgBkd0e0f0g0X0	و
SFX	2B	ى	ينه/BcBgBkd0e0f0g0X0	ى
SFX	2B	ي	ينه/BcBgBkd0e0f0g0X0	ي
SFX	2B	0	ينه/BcBgBkd0e0f0g0X0	[^أايوى]
SFX	2B	أ	ئيه/BcBoBsd0e0f0g0X0	أ
SFX	2B	ا	يه/BcBoBsd0e0f0g0X0	ا
SFX	2B	و	يه/BcBoBsd0e0f0g0X0	و
SFX	2B	ى	يه/BcBoBsd0e0f0g0X0	ى
SFX	2B	ي	يه/BcBoBsd0e0f0g0X0	ي
SFX	2B	0	يه/BcBoBsd0e0f0g0X0	[^أايوى]
SFX	2B	أ	آنه/BcBgBke0f0g0X0	أ
SFX	2B	ا	وانه/BcBgBke0f0g0X0	ا
SFX	2B	و	وانه/BcBgBke0f0g0X0	و
SFX	2B	ى	يانه/BcBgBke0f0g0X0	ى
SFX	2B	ي	يانه/BcBgBke0f0g0X0	ي
SFX	2B	0	انه/BcBgBke0f0g0X0	[^أايوى]
SFX	2B	أ	آه/BcBoBse0f0g0X0	أ
SFX	2B	ا	واه/BcBoBse0f0g0X0	ا
SFX	2B	و	واه/BcBoBse0f0g0X0	و
SFX	2B	ى	ياه/BcBoBse0f0g0X0	ى
SFX	2B	ي	ياه/BcBoBse0f0g0X0	ي
SFX	2B	0	اه/BcBoBse0f0g0X0	[^أايوى]
SFX	2B	أ	ؤونه/BcBgBkf0X0	أ
SFX	2B	ا	ونه/BcBgBkf0X0	ا
SFX	2B	و	ونه/BcBgBkf0X0	و
SFX	2B	ى	ونه/BcBgBkf0X0	ى
SFX	2B	ي	ونه/BcBgBkf0X0	ي
SFX	2B	0	ونه/BcBgBkf0X0	[^أايوى]
SFX	2B	أ	ؤوه/BcBoBsf0X0	أ
SFX	2B	ا	وه/BcBoBsf0X0	ا
SFX	2B	و	وه/BcBoBsf0X0	و
SFX	2B	ى	وه/BcBoBsf0X0	ى
SFX	2B	ي	وه/BcBoBsf0X0	ي
SFX	2B	0	وه/BcBoBsf0X0	[^أايوى]

#أنتن
SFX	3B	Y	7
SFX	3B	ن	نه/BcBgBkBoBsf0g0X0	ن
SFX	3B	أ	أنه/BcBgBkBoBsf0g0X0	أ
SFX	3B	ا	ونه/BcBgBkBoBsf0g0X0	ا
SFX	3B	و	ونه/BcBgBkBoBsf0g0X0	و
SFX	3B	ى	ينه/BcBgBkBoBsf0g0X0	ى
SFX	3B	ي	ينه/BcBgBkBoBsf0g0X0	ي
SFX	3B	0	نه/BcBgBkBoBsf0g0X0	[^نأايوى]

#أنا-نحن-أنتَ
SFX	1C	Y	15
SFX	1C	أ	ؤه/CaCeCib0c0X0	أ
SFX	1C	أ	أه/CaCmCqb0c0X0	أ
SFX	1C	ا	وه/CaCeCiCmCqb0c0X0	ا
SFX	1C	ا	ه/CaCqb0c0X0	ا
SFX	1C	0	ه/CaCeCiCmCqb0c0X0	[^أا]
SFX	1C	أ	ؤه/CbCfCjc0X0	أ
SFX	1C	أ	أه/CbCnCrc0X0	أ
SFX	1C	ا	وه/CbCfCjCnCrc0X0	ا
SFX	1C	ا	ه/CbCrc0X0	ا
SFX	1C	0	ه/CbCfCjCnCrc0X0	[^أا]
SFX	1C	أ	ؤه/CcCgCkd0e0f0X0	أ
SFX	1C	أ	أه/CcCoCsd0e0f0X0	أ
SFX	1C	ا	وه/CcCgCkCoCsd0e0f0X0	ا
SFX	1C	ا	ه/CcCsd0e0f0X0	ا
SFX	1C	0	ه/CcCgCkCoCsd0e0f0X0	[^أا]

#أنا-نحن-أنتَ
SFX	?C	Y	3
SFX	?C	0	ه/CaCqb0c0X0	.
SFX	?C	0	ه/CbCrc0X0	.
SFX	?C	0	ه/CcCsd0e0f0X0	.

#أنت-أنتما-أنتم
SFX	2C	Y	18
SFX	2C	أ	ئينه/CcCgCkd0e0f0g0X0	أ
SFX	2C	ا	ينه/CcCgCkd0e0f0g0X0	ا
SFX	2C	0	ينه/CcCgCkd0e0f0g0X0	[^أا]
SFX	2C	أ	ئيه/CcCoCsd0e0f0g0X0	أ
SFX	2C	ا	يه/CcCoCsd0e0f0g0X0	ا
SFX	2C	0	يه/CcCoCsd0e0f0g0X0	[^أا]
SFX	2C	أ	آنه/CcCgCke0f0g0X0	أ
SFX	2C	ا	وانه/CcCgCke0f0g0X0	ا
SFX	2C	0	انه/CcCgCke0f0g0X0	[^أا]
SFX	2C	أ	آه/CcCoCse0f0g0X0	أ
SFX	2C	ا	واه/CcCoCse0f0g0X0	ا
SFX	2C	0	اه/CcCoCse0f0g0X0	[^أا]
SFX	2C	أ	ؤونه/CcCgCkf0X0	أ
SFX	2C	ا	ونه/CcCgCkf0X0	ا
SFX	2C	0	ونه/CcCgCkf0X0	[^أا]
SFX	2C	أ	ؤوه/CcCoCsf0X0	أ
SFX	2C	ا	وه/CcCoCsf0X0	ا
SFX	2C	0	وه/CcCoCsf0X0	[^أا]

#أنتن
SFX	3C	Y	4
SFX	3C	ن	نه/CcCgCkCoCsf0g0X0	ن
SFX	3C	أ	أنه/CcCgCkCoCsf0g0X0	أ
SFX	3C	ا	ونه/CcCgCkCoCsf0g0X0	ا
SFX	3C	0	نه/CcCgCkCoCsf0g0X0	[^نأا]

#أنا-نحن-أنتَ
SFX	1D	Y	3
SFX	1D	0	ه/DaDeDiDmDqb0c0X0	.
SFX	1D	0	ه/DbDfDjDnDrc0X0	.
SFX	1D	0	ه/DcDgDkDoDsd0e0f0X0	.

#أنا-نحن-أنتَ
SFX	?D	Y	3
SFX	?D	0	ه/DaDqb0c0X0	.
SFX	?D	0	ه/DbDrc0X0	.
SFX	?D	0	ه/DcDsd0e0f0X0	.

#أنت-أنتما-أنتم
SFX	2D	Y	6
SFX	2D	0	ينه/DcDgDkd0e0f0g0X0	.
SFX	2D	0	يه/DcDoDsd0e0f0g0X0	.
SFX	2D	0	انه/DcDgDke0f0g0X0	.
SFX	2D	0	اه/DcDoDse0f0g0X0	.
SFX	2D	0	ونه/DcDgDkf0X0	.
SFX	2D	0	ون/DcDoDsf0X0	.

#أنتن
SFX	3D	Y	2
SFX	3D	ن	نه/DcDgDkDoDsf0g0X0	ن
SFX	3D	0	نه/DcDgDkDoDsf0g0X0	[^ن]

#أنا-نحن-أنتَ
SFX	1E	Y	15
SFX	1E	ى	يه/EaEeEiEmEqb0c0X0	ى
SFX	1E	ي	اه/EaEeEiEmEqb0c0X0	ي
SFX	1E	ى	ه/EaEqb0c0X0	ى
SFX	1E	ي	ه/EaEqb0c0X0	ي
SFX	1E	0	ه/EaEeEiEmEqb0c0X0	[^يى]
SFX	1E	ى	يه/EbEfEjEnErc0X0	ى
SFX	1E	ي	اه/EbEfEjEnErc0X0	ي
SFX	1E	ى	ه/EbErc0X0	ى
SFX	1E	ي	ه/EbErc0X0	ي
SFX	1E	0	ه/EbEfEjEnErc0X0	[^يى]
SFX	1E	ى	يه/EcEgEkEoEsd0e0f0X0	ى
SFX	1E	ي	اه/EcEgEkEoEsd0e0f0X0	ي
SFX	1E	ى	ه/EcEsd0e0f0X0	ى
SFX	1E	ي	ه/EcEsd0e0f0X0	ي
SFX	1E	0	ه/EcEgEkEoEsd0e0f0X0	[^يى]

#أنا-نحن-أنتَ
SFX	?E	Y	3
SFX	?E	0	ه/EaEqb0c0X0	.
SFX	?E	0	ه/EbErc0X0	.
SFX	?E	0	ه/EcEsd0e0f0X0	.

#أنت-أنتما-أنتم
SFX	2E	Y	18
SFX	2E	ى	ينه/EcEgEkd0e0f0g0X0	ى
SFX	2E	ي	ينه/EcEgEkd0e0f0g0X0	ي
SFX	2E	0	ينه/EcEgEkd0e0f0g0X0	[^يى]
SFX	2E	ى	يه/EcEoEsd0e0f0g0X0	ى
SFX	2E	ي	يه/EcEoEsd0e0f0g0X0	ي
SFX	2E	0	يه/EcEoEsd0e0f0g0X0	[^يى]
SFX	2E	ى	يانه/EcEgEke0f0g0X0	ى
SFX	2E	ي	يانه/EcEgEke0f0g0X0	ي
SFX	2E	0	انه/EcEgEke0f0g0X0	[^يى]
SFX	2E	ى	ياه/EcEoEse0f0g0X0	ى
SFX	2E	ي	ياه/EcEoEse0f0g0X0	ي
SFX	2E	0	اه/EcEoEse0f0g0X0	[^يى]
SFX	2E	ى	ونه/EcEgEkf0X0	ى
SFX	2E	ي	ونه/EcEgEkf0X0	ي
SFX	2E	0	ونه/EcEgEkf0X0	[^يى]
SFX	2E	ى	وه/EcEoEsf0X0	ى
SFX	2E	ي	وه/EcEoEsf0X0	ي
SFX	2E	0	وه/EcEoEsf0X0	[^يى]

#أنتن
SFX	3E	Y	4
SFX	3E	ن	نه/EcEgEkEoEsf0g0X0	ن
SFX	3E	ى	ينه/EcEgEkEoEsf0g0X0	ى
SFX	3E	ي	ينه/EcEgEkEoEsf0g0X0	ي
SFX	3E	0	نه/EcEgEkEoEsf0g0X0	[^نيى]

#أنا-نحن-أنتَ
SFX	1F	Y	21
SFX	1F	أ	ؤه/FaFeFib0c0X0	أ
SFX	1F	أ	أه/FaFmFqb0c0X0	أ
SFX	1F	ئ	ؤه/FaFeFib0c0X0	ئ
SFX	1F	ئ	أه/FaFmFqb0c0X0	ئ
SFX	1F	ى	يه/FaFeFiFmFqb0c0X0	ى
SFX	1F	ى	ه/FaFqb0c0X0	ى
SFX	1F	0	ه/FaFeFiFmFqb0c0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	1F	أ	ؤه/FbFfFjc0X0	أ
SFX	1F	أ	أه/FbFnFrc0X0	أ
SFX	1F	ئ	ؤه/FbFfFjc0X0	ئ
SFX	1F	ئ	أه/FbFnFrc0X0	ئ
SFX	1F	ى	يه/FbFfFjFnFrc0X0	ى
SFX	1F	ى	ه/FbFrc0X0	ى
SFX	1F	0	ه/FbFfFjFnFrc0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	1F	أ	ؤه/FcFgFkd0e0f0X0	أ
SFX	1F	أ	أه/FcFoFsd0e0f0X0	أ
SFX	1F	ئ	ؤه/FcFgFkd0e0f0X0	ئ
SFX	1F	ئ	أه/FcFoFsd0e0f0X0	ئ
SFX	1F	ى	يه/FcFgFkFoFsd0e0f0X0	ى
SFX	1F	ى	ه/FcFsd0e0f0X0	ى
SFX	1F	0	ه/FcFgFkFoFsd0e0f0X0	[^أئى]

#أنت-أنتما-أنتم
SFX	2F	Y	24
SFX	2F	أ	ئينه/FcFgFkd0e0f0g0X0	أ
SFX	2F	ئ	ئينه/FcFgFkd0e0f0g0X0	ئ
SFX	2F	ى	ينه/FcFgFkd0e0f0g0X0	ى
SFX	2F	0	ينه/FcFgFkd0e0f0g0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	2F	أ	ئيه/FcFoFsd0e0f0g0X0	أ
SFX	2F	ئ	ئيه/FcFoFsd0e0f0g0X0	ئ
SFX	2F	ى	يه/FcFoFsd0e0f0g0X0	ى
SFX	2F	0	يه/FcFoFsd0e0f0g0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	2F	أ	آنه/FcFgFke0f0g0X0	أ
SFX	2F	ئ	آنه/FcFgFke0f0g0X0	ئ
SFX	2F	ى	يانه/FcFgFke0f0g0X0	ى
SFX	2F	0	انه/FcFgFke0f0g0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	2F	أ	آه/FcFoFse0f0g0X0	أ
SFX	2F	ئ	آه/FcFoFse0f0g0X0	ئ
SFX	2F	ى	يآه/FcFoFse0f0g0X0	ى
SFX	2F	0	آه/FcFoFse0f0g0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	2F	أ	ؤونه/FcFgFkf0X0	أ
SFX	2F	ئ	ؤونه/FcFgFkf0X0	ئ
SFX	2F	ى	ونه/FcFgFkf0X0	ى
SFX	2F	0	ونه/FcFgFkf0X0	[^أئى]
SFX	2F	أ	ؤوه/FcFoFsf0X0	أ
SFX	2F	ئ	ؤوه/FcFoFsf0X0	ئ
SFX	2F	ى	وه/FcFoFsf0X0	ى
SFX	2F	0	وه/FcFoFsf0X0	[^أئى]

#أنتن
SFX	3F	Y	5
SFX	3F	ن	نه/FcFgFkFoFsf0g0X0	ن
SFX	3F	أ	أنه/FcFgFkFoFsf0g0X0	أ
SFX	3F	ئ	أنه/FcFgFkFoFsf0g0X0	ئ
SFX	3F	ى	ينه/FcFgFkFoFsf0g0X0	ى
SFX	3F	0	نه/FcFgFkFoFsf0g0X0	[^نأئى]

#أنا-نحن-أنتَ
SFX	1G	Y	63
SFX	1G	أ	ؤه/AaAeAiAmAqb0c0X0	أ
SFX	1G	اء	اؤه/AaAeAib0c0X0	اء
SFX	1G	اء	اءه/AaAmAqb0c0X0	اء
SFX	1G	آ	آه/AaAeAiAmAqb0c0X0	آ
SFX	1G	ا	اه/AaAeAiAmAqb0c0X0	[^ي]ا
SFX	1G	ا	اه/AaAeAiAmAqb0c0X0	يا
SFX	1G	ى	اه/AaAeAiAmAqb0c0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	1G	ي	يه/AaAeAiAmAqb0c0X0	ي
SFX	1G	ءى	ءاه/AaAeAiAmAqb0c0X0	ءى
SFX	1G	أى	آه/AaAeAiAmAqb0c0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	1G	أى	آه/AaAeAiAmAqb0c0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	1G	اء	أه/AaAqb0c0X0	اء
SFX	1G	آ	أه/AaAqb0c0X0	آ
SFX	1G	ا	ه/AaAqb0c0X0	[^ي]ا
SFX	1G	ا	ه/AaAqb0c0X0	يا
SFX	1G	ى	ه/AaAqb0c0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	1G	ي	ه/AaAqb0c0X0	ي
SFX	1G	ءى	ءه/AaAqb0c0X0	ءى
SFX	1G	أى	أه/AaAqb0c0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	1G	أى	ئه/AaAqb0c0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	1G	0	ه/AaAeAiAmAqb0c0X0	[^أءاآيى]
SFX	1G	أ	ؤه/AbAfAjAnArc0X0	أ
SFX	1G	اء	اؤه/AbAfAjc0X0	اء
SFX	1G	اء	اءه/AbAnArc0X0	اء
SFX	1G	آ	آه/AbAfAjAnArc0X0	آ
SFX	1G	ا	اه/AbAfAjAnArc0X0	[^ي]ا
SFX	1G	ا	اه/AbAfAjAnArc0X0	يا
SFX	1G	ى	اه/AbAfAjAnArc0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	1G	ي	يه/AbAfAjAnArc0X0	ي
SFX	1G	ءى	ءاه/AbAfAjAnArc0X0	ءى
SFX	1G	أى	آه/AbAfAjAnArc0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	1G	أى	آه/AbAfAjAnArc0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	1G	اء	أه/AbArc0X0	اء
SFX	1G	آ	أه/AbArc0X0	آ
SFX	1G	ا	ه/AbArc0X0	[^ي]ا
SFX	1G	ا	ه/AbArc0X0	يا
SFX	1G	ى	ه/AbArc0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	1G	ي	ه/AbArc0X0	ي
SFX	1G	ءى	ءه/AbArc0X0	ءى
SFX	1G	أى	أه/AbArc0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	1G	أى	ئه/AbArc0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	1G	0	ه/AbAfAjAnArc0X0	[^أءاآيى]
SFX	1G	أ	ؤه/AcAgAkAoAsd0e0f0X0	أ
SFX	1G	اء	اؤه/AcAgAkd0e0f0X0	اء
SFX	1G	اء	اءه/AcAoAsd0e0f0X0	اء
SFX	1G	آ	آه/AcAgAkAoAsd0e0f0X0	آ
SFX	1G	ا	اه/AcAgAkAoAsd0e0f0X0	[^ي]ا
SFX	1G	ا	اه/AcAgAkAoAsd0e0f0X0	يا
SFX	1G	ى	اه/AcAgAkAoAsd0e0f0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	1G	ي	يه/AcAgAkAoAsd0e0f0X0	ي
SFX	1G	ءى	ءاه/AcAgAkAoAsd0e0f0X0	ءى
SFX	1G	أى	آه/AcAgAkAoAsd0e0f0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	1G	أى	آه/AcAgAkAoAsd0e0f0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	1G	اء	أه/AcAsd0e0f0X0	اء
SFX	1G	آ	أه/AcAsd0e0f0X0	آ
SFX	1G	ا	ه/AcAsd0e0f0X0	[^ي]ا
SFX	1G	ا	ه/AcAsd0e0f0X0	يا
SFX	1G	ى	ه/AcAsd0e0f0X0	[^أء]ى
SFX	1G	ي	ه/AcAsd0e0f0X0	ي
SFX	1G	ءى	ءه/AcAsd0e0f0X0	ءى
SFX	1G	أى	أه/AcAsd0e0f0X0	[ت]أى
SFX	1G	أى	ئه/AcAsd0e0f0X0	[^ت]أى
SFX	1G	0	ه/AcAgAkAoAsd0e0f0X0	[^أءاآيى]
